New York, session 2025-2026, A7152.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 15-108 of the election law is 2 amended to read as follows: 3 1. Nominations of candidates for elective village offices shall be 4 made as provided in this section. Provided, however, that the desig- 5 nation and nomination of candidates for village offices, when a village 6 pursuant to section 15-104 of this article has provided that village 7 elections shall occur on the day of the general election, shall be made 8 pursuant to sections 6-100 through 6-108 of this chapter. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08408-02-5